Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.310

Submission of information by applicant.

In addition to the information required in RCW 32.32.305, the applicant shall submit information demonstrating to the satisfaction of the director the independence and expertise of any person preparing materials under RCW 32.32.305. However, a person will not be considered as lacking independence for the reason that the person will participate in effecting a sale of capital stock under the plan of conversion or will receive a fee from the applicant for services rendered in connection with the appraisal.

[ 1994 c 92 s 380; 1981 c 85 s 61.]